Tennessee, session 114, SB1427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30 of the Private Acts of 1975, as amended by Chapter 39 of the
Private Acts of 1989, and any other acts amendatory thereto, are repealed.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Bedford County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body of Bedford County and certified to the secretary of
state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
SB1427
001059
- 1 -